test/src/morphology/N-tialanw19_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Noun - `tialanõ: # Noun (19) `tialanõ 'eng /est /fin' - full paradigm
     tialanõ+N+Sg+Nom: tialanõ
     tialanõ+N+Sg+Gen: [tialadsõ, tialasõ]
     tialanõ+N+Sg+Par: tialast
     tialanõ+N+Sg+Ill: tialastõ
     tialanõ+N+Pl+Gen: [tialaidsi, tialaisi, tialastõ]
     tialanõ+N+Pl+Par: [tialaidsi, tialaisi]
     tialanõ+N+Pl+Ill: [tialaidsihe, tialaisihe]
     tialanõ+N+Pl+All: [tialaidsilõ, tialaisilõ, tialastõlõ]
